Utah statutes.
41-6a-1106.   Bicycles and human powered vehicle or device to yield right-of-way to pedestrians on sidewalks, paths, or trails -- Uses prohibited -- Negligent collision prohibited -- Speed restrictions -- Rights and duties same as pedestrians.

(1)  A person operating a bicycle or a vehicle or device propelled by human power shall:

(a)  yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian; and

(b)  give an audible signal before overtaking and passing a pedestrian.

(2)  A person may not operate a bicycle or a vehicle or device propelled by human power on a sidewalk, path, or trail, or across a roadway in a crosswalk, where prohibited by a traffic-control device or ordinance.

(3)  A person may not operate a bicycle or a vehicle or device propelled by human power in a negligent manner so as to collide with a:

(a)  pedestrian; or

(b)  person operating a:

(i)  bicycle; or

(ii)  vehicle or device propelled by human power.

(4)  A person operating a bicycle or a vehicle or device propelled by human power on a sidewalk, path, or trail, or across a driveway, or across a roadway on a crosswalk may not operate at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the existing conditions, giving regard to the actual and potential hazards then existing.

(5)  Except as provided under Subsections (1) and (4), a person operating a bicycle or a vehicle or device propelled by human power on a sidewalk, path, or trail, or across a roadway on a crosswalk, has all the rights and duties applicable to a pedestrian under the same circumstances.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

